Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 7. Judicial Review, Penalties, and Enforcement.

Collateral references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Utilities, §§ 276 — 291.

73B C.J.S., Public Utilities, §§ 64 — 68.

Sec. 42.05.541.
Effect of regulations.

Regulations adopted and issued by the commission in accordance with this chapter have the effect of law.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For gas utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.550.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.551.
Review and enforcement.

All final orders of the commission are subject to judicial review in accordance with AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

.

If an appeal is not taken from a final order of the commission, the commission may apply to the superior court for enforcement of this chapter, the regulations adopted under it, and the orders of the commission. The court shall enforce the order by injunction or other process.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Sec. 42.05.560.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.561.
Injunctions and monetary sanctions.

A person who violates a provision of AS

42.05.291

insofar as it governs the safety of pipeline facilities and the transportation of gas, or of any regulation issued under AS

42.05.291

is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation for each day that the violation persists. However, the maximum civil penalty may not exceed $200,000 for any related series of violations.

A civil penalty may be compromised by the commission. In determining the amount of the penalty, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, the appropriateness of the penalty to the size of the business of the person charged, the gravity of the violation, and the good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance, after notification of a violation, shall be considered. The amount of the penalty, when finally determined, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, may be deducted from any sums owing by the state to the person charged or may be recovered in a civil action in the state courts.

A person may be enjoined by the superior court from committing any violation mentioned in this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.570.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.571.
Civil penalties.

In addition to all other penalties and remedies provided by law, a public utility and every person, and their lessees or receivers appointed by a court in any way subject to the provisions of this chapter, together with their officers, managers, agents, or employees that either violate or procure, aid, or abet the violation of any provision of this chapter, or of any order, regulation, or written requirement of the commission are subject to a maximum penalty of $100 for each violation. Each act of omission as well as each act of commission shall be considered a violation subject to the penalty.

A penalty may not be assessed unless the commission first issues an order to show cause why the penalty should not be levied. The order shall describe each violation with reasonable particularity and designate the maximum penalty that may be assessed for each violation. The order shall be served on the alleged violator named in the order. The order must state a time and place for the hearing.

After a hearing, the commission shall enter its findings of fact and final order. The order must state when the penalties, if any, are payable.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 87 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (c), inserted a comma following “After a hearing” at the beginning, in the second sentence substituted “The order must” for “which shall”.

Sec. 42.05.580.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.581.
Each violation a separate offense.

Each violation of a provision of this chapter or of an order, decision, regulation, or written requirement of the commission is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation each day’s continuance is a separate and distinct offense.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Secs. 42.05.590 — 42.05.600.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.601.
Actions to recover penalties; disposition.

Actions to recover penalties under this chapter shall be brought by the attorney general in a court of competent jurisdiction.

All penalties recovered under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid to the commission and deposited by it in the general fund of the state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.610.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.611.
Penalties cumulative.

All penalties imposed under this chapter are cumulative and an action for the recovery of a civil penalty is not a bar to any criminal prosecution. A criminal prosecution is not a bar to an action for the recovery of a civil penalty.

Neither a criminal prosecution nor an action to recover a civil penalty is a bar to an enforcement proceeding to require compliance, or to any other remedy provided by this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.620.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.621.
Joinder of actions.

Under the applicable court rules, appeals from orders of the commission, applications for enforcement of commission orders, and actions for recovery of a penalty may be joined.
The court may, in the interests of justice, separate the action.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Sec. 42.05.630.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]